test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_cuarvud_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: XXX
  hfst: XXX
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: XXX
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: XXX


  Verb - čuárvuđ: # not checked
    čuárvuđ+V+Inf: čuárˊvuuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuärvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čuärvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárˊvu
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuárˊvoon
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čuárˊvuvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čuárˊvuv
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čuárˊvup
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čuárˊvuvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuárˊvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuárˊvum
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čuárˊvuh
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čuárvui
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čuárˊvoim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čuárˊvoid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čuárˊvoin
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čuárvuim
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čuárvuid
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuárˊvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čuárˊvuuččim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čuárˊvuuččih
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čuárˊvuuččij
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du1: čuárˊvuuččáim
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du2: čuárˊvuuččáid
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Du3: čuárˊvuuččáin
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čuárˊvuuččijm
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čuárˊvuuččijd
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: čuárˊvuuččii
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čuárˊvuueem
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čuárˊvuueeh
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čuárˊvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du1: čuárˊvuueen
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du2: čuárˊvuuvettee
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Du3: čuárˊvuuuv
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čuárˊvuuep
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čuárˊvuuvetteđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čuárˊvuueh
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+PrsPrc: čuárˊvuuee
    čuárvuđ+V+PrfPrc: čuárˊvuum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio: čuárˊvuum
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ess: čuárˊvuumin
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Loc: čuárˊvuumist
    čuárvuđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    čuárvuđ+V+Ger: čuárˊvuudijn
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárˊvuuhennáá
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárˊvuuhinnáá
    čuárvuđ+V+VAbess: čuárˊvuuhánnáá


  Verb - uážžuđ: # not checked
    uážžuđ+V+Inf: uážˊžuuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uážuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážˊžu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uážˊžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uážˊžuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uážˊžuv
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uážˊžup
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uážˊžuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážˊžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uážˊžum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uážˊžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uážui
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uážˊžoim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uážˊžoid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uážˊžoin
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uážuim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uážuid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uážˊžuu
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uážˊžuuččim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uážˊžuuččih
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uážˊžuuččij
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du1: uážˊžuuččáim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du2: uážˊžuuččáid
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du3: uážˊžuuččáin
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uážˊžuuččijm
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uážˊžuuččijd
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uážˊžuuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uážˊžuueem
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uážˊžuueeh
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: uážˊžuu
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du1: uážˊžuueen
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du2: uážˊžuuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Du3: uážˊžuuuv
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: uážˊžuuep
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: uážˊžuuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: uážˊžuueh
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+PrsPrc: uážˊžuuee
    uážžuđ+V+PrfPrc: uážˊžuum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio: uážˊžuum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uážˊžuumin
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uážˊžuumist
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    uážžuđ+V+Ger: uážˊžuudijn
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážˊžuuhennáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážˊžuuhinnáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážˊžuuhánnáá


  Verb - kuárruđ: # not checked
    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruuđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuáruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáṛu
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárˊroon
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuáˊṛuvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárruv
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuárruvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuárruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuárruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuárui
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kuárroim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kuárroid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kuárroin
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuáruim
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuáruid
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuárruu
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kuárruuččim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kuárruuččih
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kuárruuččij
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du1: kuárruuččáim
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du2: kuárruuččáid
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Du3: kuárruuččáin
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kuárruuččijm
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kuárruuččijd
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kuárruuččii
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kuárruueem
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kuárruueeh
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kuárruu
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du1: kuárruueen
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du2: kuárruuvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Du3: kuárruuuv
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kuárruuep
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kuárruuvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kuárruueh
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+PrsPrc: kuárruuee
    kuárruđ+V+PrfPrc: kuárruum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio: kuárruum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ess: kuárruumin
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Loc: kuárruumist
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    kuárruđ+V+Ger: kuárruudijn
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuárruuhennáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuárruuhinnáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuárruuhánnáá
